epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sk.xml
	<patterns>
		<!-- % samohlásky -->
		a1
		á1
		ä1
		e1
		é1
		i1
		í1
		o1
		ó1
		ô1
		u1
		ú1
		y1
		ý1
		i2a
		i2á
		i2e
		i2u
		o2u
		c2h
		d2z
		d2ž
		<!-- % dvojice spoluhlások -->
		2b1b
		2b1c
		2b1č
		2b1d
		2b1ď
		2b1f
		2b1g
		2b1h
		2b1c2h
		2b1j
		2b1k
		2b1l
		2b1ľ
		2b1m
		2b1n
		2b1ň
		2b1p
		2b1r
		2b1s
		2b1š
		2b1t
		2b1ť
		2b1v
		2b1w
		2b1x
		2b1z
		2b1ž
		2b1d2z
		2b1d2ž
		2c1b
		2c1c
		2c1č
		2c1d
		2c1ď
		2c1f
		2c1g
		2c1c2h
		2c1j
		2c1k
		2c1l
		2c1ľ
		2c1m
		2c1n
		2c1ň
		2c1p
		2c1r
		2c1s
		2c1š
		2c1t
		2c1ť
		2c1v
		2c1w
		2c1x
		2c1z
		2c1ž
		2c1d2z
		2c1d2ž
		2č1b
		2č1c
		2č1č
		2č1d
		2č1ď
		2č1f
		2č1g
		2č1h
		2č1c2h
		2č1j
		2č1k
		2č1l
		2č1ľ
		2č1m
		2č1n
		2č1ň
		2č1p
		2č1r
		2č1s
		2č1š
		2č1t
		2č1ť
		2č1v
		2č1w
		2č1x
		2č1z
		2č1ž
		2č1d2z
		2č1d2ž
		2d1b
		2d1c
		2d1č
		2d1d
		2d1ď
		2d1f
		2d1g
		2d1h
		2d1c2h
		2d1j
		2d1k
		2d1l
		2d1ľ
		2d1m
		2d1n
		2d1ň
		2d1p
		2d1r
		2d1s
		2d1š
		2d1t
		2d1ť
		2d1v
		2d1d2z
		2d1d2ž
		2ď1b
		2ď1c
		2ď1č
		2ď1d
		2ď1ď
		2ď1f
		2ď1g
		2ď1h
		2ď1c2h
		2ď1j
		2ď1k
		2ď1l
		2ď1ľ
		.as4t4ro3
		.atmo3
		.a2u1to3
		2ď1m
		2ď1n
		2ď1ň
		2ď1p
		2ď1r
		2ď1s
		2ď1š
		2ď1t
		2ď1ť
		2ď1v
		2ď1z
		2ď1ž
		2ď1d2z
		2ď1d2ž
		2f1b
		2f1c
		2f1č
		2f1d
		2f1ď
		2f1f
		2f1g
		2f1h
		2f1c2h
		2f1j
		2f1k
		2f1l
		2f1ľ
		2f1m
		2f1n
		2f1ň
		2f1p
		2f1r
		2f1s
		2f1š
		2f1t
		2f1ť
		2f1v
		2f1z
		2f1ž
		2f1d2z
		2f1d2ž
		2g1b
		2g1c
		2g1č
		2g1d
		2g1ď
		2g1f
		2g1g
		2g1h
		2g1c2h
		2g1j
		2g1k
		2g1l
		2g1ľ
		2g1m
		2g1n
		2g1ň
		2g1p
		2g1r
		2g1s
		2g1š
		2g1t
		2g1ť
		2g1v
		2g1z
		2g1ž
		2g1d2z
		2g1d2ž
		2h1b
		2h1c
		2h1č
		2h1d
		2h1ď
		2h1f
		2h1g
		2h1h
		2h1c2h
		2h1j
		2h1k
		2h1l
		2h1ľ
		2h1m
		2h1n
		2h1ň
		2h1p
		2h1r
		2h1s
		2h1š
		2h1t
		2h1ť
		2h1v
		2h1z
		2h1ž
		2h1d2z
		2h1d2ž
		2c2h1b
		2c2h1c
		2c2h1č
		2c2h1d
		2c2h1ď
		2c2h1f
		2c2h1g
		2c2h1h
		2c2h1c2h
		2c2h1j
		2c2h1k
		2c2h1l
		2c2h1ľ
		2c2h1m
		2c2h1n
		2c2h1ň
		2c2h1p
		2c2h1r
		2c2h1s
		2c2h1š
		2c2h1t
		2c2h1ť
		2c2h1v
		2c2h1w
		2c2h1ž
		2c2h1d2z
		2c2h1d2ž
		2j1b
		2j1c
		2j1č
		2j1d
		2j1ď
		2j1f
		2j1g
		2j1h
		2j1c2h
		2j1j
		2j1k
		2j1l
		2j1ľ
		2j1m
		2j1n
		2j1ň
		2j1p
		2j1r
		2j1s
		2j1š
		2j1t
		2j1ť
		2j1v
		2j1w
		2j1x
		2j1z
		2j1ž
		2j1d2z
		2j1d2ž
		2k1b
		2k1c
		2k1č
		2k1d
		2k1ď
		2k1f
		2k1g
		2k1h
		2k1c2h
		2k1j
		2k1k
		2k1l
		2k1ľ
		2k1m
		2k1n
		2k1ň
		2k1p
		2k1r
		2k1s
		2k1š
		2k1t
		2k1ť
		2k1v
		2k1w
		2k1x
		2k1z
		2k1ž
		2k1d2z
		2k1d2ž
		2l1b
		2l1c
		2l1č
		2l1d
		2l1ď
		2l1f
		2l1g
		2l1h
		2l1c2h
		2l1j
		2l1k
		2l1l
		2l1ľ
		2l1m
		2l1n
		2l1ň
		2l1p
		2l1r
		2l1s
		2l1š
		2l1t
		2l1ť
		2l1v
		2l1z
		2l1ž
		2l1d2z
		2l1d2ž
		2ľ1b
		2ľ1c
		2ľ1č
		2ľ1d
		2ľ1ď
		2ľ1f
		2ľ1g
		2ľ1h
		2ľ1c2h
		2ľ1j
		2ľ1k
		2ľ1l
		2ľ1ľ
		2ľ1m
		2ľ1n
		2ľ1ň
		2ľ1p
		2ľ1r
		2ľ1s
		2ľ1š
		2ľ1t
		2ľ1ť
		2ľ1v
		2ľ1z
		2ľ1ž
		2ľ1d2z
		2ľ1d2ž
		2m1b
		2m1c
		2m1č
		2m1d
		2m1ď
		2m1f
		2m1g
		2m1h
		2m1c2h
		2m1j
		2m1k
		2m1l
		2m1ľ
		2m1m
		2m1n
		2m1ň
		2m1p
		2m1r
		2m1s
		2m1š
		2m1t
		2m1ť
		2m1v
		2m1z
		2m1ž
		2m1d2z
		2m1d2ž
		2n1b
		2n1c
		2n1č
		2n1d
		2n1ď
		2n1f
		2n1g
		2n1h
		2n1c2h
		2n1j
		2n1k
		2n1l
		2n1ľ
		2n1m
		2n1n
		2n1ň
		2n1p
		2n1r
		2n1s
		2n1š
		2n1t
		2n1ť
		2n1v
		2n1w
		2n1x
		2n1z
		2n1ž
		2n1d2z
		2n1d2ž
		2ň1b
		2ň1c
		2ň1č
		2ň1d
		2ň1ď
		2ň1f
		2ň1g
		2ň1h
		2ň1c2h
		2ň1j
		2ň1k
		2ň1l
		2ň1ľ
		2ň1m
		2ň1n
		2ň1ň
		2ň1p
		2ň1r
		2ň1s
		2ň1š
		2ň1t
		2ň1ť
		2ň1v
		2ň1z
		2ň1ž
		2ň1d2z
		2ň1d2ž
		2p1b
		2p1c
		2p1č
		2p1d
		2p1ď
		2p1f
		2p1g
		2p1h
		2p1c2h
		2p1j
		2p1k
		2p1l
		2p1ľ
		2p1m
		2p1n
		2p1ň
		2p1p
		2p1r
		2p1s
		2p1š
		2p1t
		2p1ť
		2p1v
		2p1w
		2p1x
		2p1z
		2p1ž
		2p1d2z
		2p1d2ž
		2r1b
		2r1c
		2r1č
		2r1d
		2r1ď
		2r1f
		2r1g
		2r1h
		2r1c2h
		2r1j
		2r1k
		2r1l
		2r1ľ
		2r1m
		2r1n
		2r1ň
		2r1p
		2r1r
		2r1s
		2r1š
		2r1t
		2r1ť
		2r1v
		2r1w
		2r1x
		2r1z
		2r1ž
		2r1d2z
		2r1d2ž
		2s1b
		2s1c
		2s1č
		2s1d
		2s1ď
		2s1f
		2s1g
		2s1h
		2s1c2h
		2s1j
		2s1k
		2s1l
		2s1ľ
		2s1m
		2s1n
		2s1ň
		2s1p
		2s1r
		2s1s
		2s1š
		2s1t
		2s1ť
		2s1v
		2s1z
		2s1ž
		2s1d2z
		2s1d2ž
		2š1b
		2š1c
		2š1č
		2š1d
		2š1ď
		2š1f
		2š1g
		2š1h
		2š1c2h
		2š1j
		2š1k
		2š1l
		2š1ľ
		2š1m
		2š1n
		2š1ň
		2š1p
		2š1r
		2š1s
		2š1š
		2š1t
		2š1ť
		2š1v
		2š1w
		2š1x
		2š1z
		2š1ž
		2š1d2z
		2š1d2ž
		2t1b
		2t1c
		2t1č
		2t1d
		2t1ď
		2t1f
		2t1g
		2t1h
		2t1c2h
		2t1j
		2t1k
		2t1l
		2t1ľ
		2t1m
		2t1n
		2t1ň
		2t1p
		2t1r
		2t1s
		2t1š
		2t1t
		2t1ť
		2t1v
		2t1w
		2t1x
		2t1z
		2t1ž
		2t1d2z
		2t1d2ž
		2ť1b
		2ť1c
		2ť1č
		2ť1d
		2ť1ď
		2ť1f
		2ť1g
		2ť1h
		2ť1c2h
		2ť1j
		2ť1k
		2ť1l
		2ť1ľ
		2ť1m
		2ť1n
		2ť1ň
		2ť1p
		2ť1r
		2ť1s
		2ť1š
		2ť1t
		2ť1ť
		2ť1v
		2ť1w
		2ť1x
		2ť1z
		2ť1ž
		2ť1d2z
		2ť1d2ž
		2v1b
		2v1c
		2v1č
		2v1d
		2v1ď
		2v1f
		2v1g
		2v1h
		2v1c2h
		2v1j
		2v1k
		2v1l
		2v1ľ
		2v1m
		2v1n
		2v1ň
		2v1p
		2v1r
		2v1s
		2v1š
		2v1t
		2v1ť
		2v1v
		2v1w
		2v1x
		2v1z
		2v1ž
		2v1d2z
		2v1d2ž
		2z1b
		2z1c
		2z1č
		2z1d
		2z1ď
		2z1f
		2z1g
		2z1h
		2z1c2h
		2z1j
		2z1k
		2z1l
		2z1ľ
		2z1m
		2z1n
		2z1ň
		2z1p
		2z1r
		2z1s
		2z1š
		2z1t
		2z1ť
		2z1v
		2z1z
		2z1ž
		2z1d2z
		2z1d2ž
		2ž1b
		2ž1c
		2ž1č
		2ž1d
		2ž1ď
		2ž1f
		2ž1g
		2ž1h
		2ž1c2h
		2ž1j
		2ž1k
		2ž1l
		2ž1ľ
		2ž1m
		2ž1n
		2ž1ň
		2ž1p
		2ž1r
		2ž1s
		2ž1š
		2ž1t
		2ž1ť
		2ž1v
		2ž1z
		2ž1ž
		2ž1d2z
		2ž1d2ž
		2d2z1k
		2d2z1n
		2d2z1r
		2d2z1s
		2d2ž1š
		2x1t
		2x1n
		2b1ŕ
		2ŕ1b
		2d2z1ŕ
		2ŕ1d2z
		2d2z1ľ
		2ŕ1d2ž
		2d2ž1ľ
		<!-- %2 samohlásky -->
		a1í2
		a1o2
		e1á2
		e1í2
		e1o2
		e1ó2
		e1u2
		i1o2
		o1a2
		o1e2
		o1i2
		o1o2
		u1a2
		u1á2
		u1i2
		u1í2
		u1o2
		u1u2
		y1a2
		y1e2
		y1ó2
		y1u2
		a2u1
		a2i1
		<!-- % 3 spoluhlásky -->
		b2l3b
		3b2l3č
		b2l3c2h
		3b2l3k
		3b2ľ3k
		3b2l3ň
		b2l3š
		b2ľ3š
		3b2r3b
		b2r3d
		3b2r3k
		3b2ŕ3k
		3b2r3l
		3b2ŕ3ľ
		3b2r3n
		3b2r3ň
		3b2r3v
		b2r3z
		b3s2c
		b3s2t
		c3k2t
		3c2r3č
		3c2ŕ3č
		3c2r3k
		3c2ŕ3k
		c3t2v
		3č2l3n
		3č2r3č
		č2r3p
		3č2r3t
		3č2r3v
		d3c4h4n
		3d2l3b
		3d2l3h
		d2l3n
		3d2l3ž
		3d2ľ3ž
		3d2r3d
		3d2r3g
		d2r3l
		3d2r3k
		3d2r3m
		d2r3n
		3d2r3v
		3d2r3z
		3d2r3ž
		3d2ŕ3ž
		d3s2v
		d3s2t
		d3v2r
		3f2r3č
		3f2r3f
		3f2r3k
		3f2ŕ3k
		3f2r3m
		3f2r3n
		3g2l3g
		3g2r3c
		3g2r3g
		3h2l3b
		3h2ľ3b
		3h2l3t
		3h2m2l
		3h2r3b
		3h2ŕ3b
		3h2r3č
		3h2r3d
		3h2r3d2z
		3h2r3k
		3h2r3m
		3h2r3n
		3h2r3ň
		3h2r3t
		3h2r3v
		3c2h2l3p
		3c2h2r3b
		3c2h2r3č
		c2h2r3c4h
		3c2h2r3l
		3c2h2r3t
		j2c2h3n
		j3s2t
		j3š2le
		j3t2m
		j3t2r
		3k2l3b
		3k2ľ3b
		3k2l3č
		3k2l3z
		3k2ľ3z
		k2r3b
		3k2r3č
		3k2ŕ3č
		3k2ŕ3d
		3k2r3k
		3k2ŕ3k
		3k2ŕ3m
		3k2r3p
		3k2r3s
		3k2r3t
		3k2r3v
		k3s2ľ
		k2s3n
		k3t2r
		l3d2r
		ľ3k2n
		l3t2r
		m3b2l
		m3b2ľ
		m3b2r
		m3f2l
		m3f2r
		m3k2n
		3m2l3č
		3m2l3k
		m3p2l
		m3p2ľ
		m3p2r
		m3p2s
		3m2r3h
		m2r3c4h
		3m2r3k
		m2r3l
		m2r3š
		m2r3t
		3m2r3v
		3m2r3z
		3m2ŕ3z
		m3s2t
		m3š2t
		n3dľa
		n3d2r
		n3f2l
		n3f2r
		n3g2h
		n3g2l
		n3g2ľ
		n2g3n
		n3g2r
		n3g2v
		n3k2c
		n3k2h
		n3k2n
		n3k2r
		n3k2v
		n3s2c
		n3š2p
		n3š2t
		n3t2g
		n3t2l
		n3t2n
		n3t2r
		n2ž3m
		3p2l3n
		3p2l3ň
		3p2ľ3ň
		3p2l3z
		3p2ľ3z
		3p2ľ3ž
		3p2ŕ3c
		3p2r3č
		3p2r3d
		3p2r3s
		3p2r3š
		p3š2ť
		p3t2r
		r2b3n
		r3g2ľ
		r3g2r
		r3g2s
		r3k2d
		r2k3n
		r3k2t
		r3k2v
		r3p2c
		r3p2č
		r3p2r
		r3s2p
		r3š2č
		r3š2l
		r3š2r
		r2t3m
		r3t2n
		r2t3ň
		r3t2r
		r3t2v
		3s4c4h4n
		s2k3l
		s2k3m
		s2k3n
		s3k2r
		s3k2v
		3s2l3n
		3s2l3ň
		3s2l3z
		s3p2r
		3s2r3d
		3s4ŕ3k
		3s4r3š
		s3t2k
		ôs4t3k2ár3s4t4v
		s2t3l
		s3t2m
		s2t3n
		s3t2r
		s3t2v
		s2ť3h
		s2ť3m
		s2ť3p
		š3k2l
		š3k2r
		š3t2r
		3š4t4v
		t3k2l
		t3k2n
		3t2l3č
		3t2l3k
		t3h2l
		3t4r3č
		3t4r3h
		3t2r3l
		3t2r3k
		3t2r3m
		a4t2r3n
		3t2r3n
		3t2ŕ3n
		3t2ŕ3ň
		3t4r3p
		3t2r3v
		3t2ŕ3ž
		3v2l3č
		3v2ľ3č
		3v2l3h
		3v2l3k
		3v2l3n
		3v2r3h
		3v2r3c2h
		3v2r3l
		3v2ŕ3š
		3v2ŕ3t
		3v2r3z
		3v2ŕ3z
		3v4z4d
		3v4z4h
		3v4z4n
		3v3z2ť
		z3d2n
		noz5d4r
		3z4d4r
		3z4d4v
		z3g2n
		3z4h4r
		3z2r3k
		3z2r3n
		3z4v4l
		ž2d3n
		3ž2l3č
		3ž2l3t
		3ž2ľt
		3ž2r3ď
		ž3s2t
		x3p2l
		x3p2r
		x3t2r
		<!-- % 4 spoluhlásky -->
		3b2l4č3n
		3b2ľ4č3k
		3b2l4n3k
		3b2ľ3k2n
		3b2r4b3l
		3b2r4b3t
		3b2r4č3k
		3b2r4d3c
		3b2ŕ4d3n
		3b2r3h2l
		3b4ŕ4k3n
		3b4r4m3b
		3b4r4n3č
		3b4r4n3k
		3b4r4š3l
		3b4r4t3l
		3b4r4t3n
		3b4r4v3n
		3b4r4z3d
		3b4r4z3l
		3b4r4z3n
		b3s2t2r
		3c4ŕ4č3k
		3c4r4k3n
		3c4v4r3č
		3c4v4r3k
		3c4v4ŕ3k
		3c4v4r3l
		3č4l4n3k
		3č4r3č4r
		3č4r4c4h3n
		3č4r4p3k
		3č4r4p3n
		3č4r4t3n
		3č4v4r3k
		3č4v4r3l
		3d4l4b3n
		d4ľ4ž3k
		d4l4ž3n
		d4ľ4ž3n
		3d4r4c3n
		3d4r4g3ľ
		3d4r4g3n
		3d4r4h3n
		3d4r4n3č
		3d4r4n3k
		3d4r4s3n
		3d4r4ž3b
		3d4r4ž3k
		3f4r4c3k
		3f4r4c3n
		3f4r4č3k
		3f4r4f3l
		3f4r4k3n
		3f4r4n3d
		3f4r4n3d4ž
		3f4r4n3g
		3f4r4n3k
		3g4l4g3n
		3g2r4c3k
		3h2ľ4b3k
		3h2l3t4n
		3h2r4b3č
		3h2r4č3k
		h2r4d3l
		3h2r4g3ľ
		3h2r4k3ľ
		3h2r4k3n
		3h2ŕ4k3n
		3h2r4n3č
		3h2r4s3t
		3h2r4s3ť
		3ch4ľ4p3k
		3c2h2r4b3t
		3c2h2r4c4h3l
		3c2h2r4c4h3ľ
		3c4h4r4s3t
		j3s4t4r
		j3s4t4v
		3k4l4b3č
		3k4l4b3k
		3k4l4z3k
		3k4l4z3n
		3k4r4č3m
		3k4r4č3n
		3k4r4k3v
		3k4r4m3n
		3k4ŕ4m3n
		3k4r4p3č
		3k4r4s3t
		3k4r4š3t
		3k4r4t3k
		3k4r4v3n
		3m2l4č3k
		3m2ľ4k3n
		3m2ľ4k3v
		3m2l4s3n
		m3p4r3p
		m3p4r3v
		3m4r4k3n
		3m4r4k3v
		3m4r4m3l
		3m4r4n3č
		3m4r4n3k
		3m4ŕ4š3t
		3m4ŕ4t3v
		3m4r4z3l
		3m4r4z3k
		3m4r4z3n
		n4g3s4t
		n3š4t4r
		n3t4l3m
		3p2l4z3l
		3p2ľ4z3n
		p2ŕ4c3n
		3p2r4č3k
		3p4r4d3n
		3p4ŕ4c2h3n
		3p4r4s3k
		3p4r4t3k
		r2s3k4d
		r2s3k4t
		čer4s3t4v
		3s4l4n3k
		3s4k4r3z
		3s4m4r3c
		3s4m4r3č
		3s4m4r3d
		3s4m4r3k
		3s4m4r3t
		3s4p4r3c4h
		3s4r4d3c
		3s4r4k3n
		3s4r4s3t
		3s4t4ľ3k
		s3t4r3b
		ko4s3t4r3č
		3s4t4r3č
		3s4t4ŕ3h
		3s4t4r3k
		s4t4r3v
		4s4ť5k4rát
		3š4k4l3b
		3š4k4r3k
		3š4k4ŕ3k
		maš3k4r3t
		3š4k4r3t
		3š4p4l3h
		3š4t4r3b
		š4t4r3n
		3š4t4v4r3t
		3š4t4v4r3ť
		3t2ľ4c3ť
		3t2r4b3l
		t2r4č3k
		3t2r4d3l
		3t2r4h3l
		3t2r4h3n
		3t2r4k3n
		3t2r4k3v
		3t2r4m3n
		3t4ŕ4p3n
		3t2r4ž3k
		3t2r4ž3n
		3t2v4r3d
		3t2v4r3d4z
		3t2v4ŕ3d4z
		3v2l4h3č
		3v2l4h3k
		3v2l4h3n
		3v2l4n3k
		3v2l4n3n
		3v4r4h3n
		3v4r4k3n
		3v4ŕ4z3g
		3v4r4z3g
		3v4r4z3n
		3v4r4ž3l
		3z4h4ŕ3ň
		3z4r4n3n
		3ž4l4č3n
		3ž4l4t3n
		3ž4r4d3k
		<!-- % 5 spoluhlások -->
		3b4r4n3k4n
		b3d4ľ4ž3n
		3c4v4r4č3k
		3c4v4r4n3k
		3č4ŕ4s3t4v
		3č4r4t4t3n
		3č4v4r4k3n
		3d4r4ž3g4r
		3f4r4n4g3n
		h2ŕ4s3t4k
		3c4h4r4s4t3n
		3k4r4s4t3n
		3k4r4s4t3ň
		3s4m4r4š3ť
		3s4m4r4t3k
		s3t4r4n3k
		3š4k4l4b3n
		maš3k4r4t3n
		3š4k4r4t3n
		3š4k4v4r3č
		3š4k4v4r3k
		3š4k4v4ŕ3k
		3š4k4v4r3n
		3š4m4r4d3k
		3š4m4r4n3c
		3š4p4l4h3n
		3š4t4r4k3n
		3š3t4r4n3g
		3t4v4r4d3n
		3v4r4s3t4v
		3v4r4z3g4n
		<!-- % 6 spoluhlások -->
		3c4v4r4n3g4n
		3š4k4v4r4k3n
		3š4k4v4ŕ4k3n
		<!-- % koncovka -ný -->
		k4č3ný.
		k4č3ného.
		k4č3nému.
		k4č3nom.
		k4č3ným.
		k4č3né.
		k4č3ná.
		k4č3nej.
		k4č3nú.
		k4č3nou.
		k4č3ní.
		k4č3ných.
		k4č3nými.
		k4t3ný.
		k4t3ného.
		k4t3nému.
		k4t3nom.
		k4t3ným.
		k4t3né.
		k4t3ná.
		k4t3nej.
		k4t3nú.
		k4t3nou.
		k4t3ní.
		k4t3ných.
		k4t3nými.
		n4č3ný.
		n4č3ného.
		n4č3nému.
		n4č3nom.
		n4č3ným.
		n4č3né.
		n4č3ná.
		n4č3nej.
		n4č3nú.
		n4č3nou.
		n4č3ní.
		n4č3ných.
		n4č3nými.
		n4k4č3n
		n4t3ný.
		n4t3ného.
		n4t3nému.
		n4t3nom.
		n4t3ným.
		n4t3né.
		n4t3ná.
		n4t3nej.
		n4t3nú.
		n4t3nou.
		n4t3ní.
		n4t3ných.
		n4t3nými.
		r4d3ný.
		r4d3ného.
		r4d3nému.
		r4d3nom.
		r4d3ným.
		r4d3né.
		r4d3ná.
		r4d3nej.
		r4d3nú.
		r4d3nou.
		r4d3ní.
		r4d3ných.
		r4d3nými.
		r4m3ný.
		r4m3ného.
		r4m3nému.
		r4m3nom.
		r4m3ným.
		r4m3né.
		r4m3ná.
		r4m3nej.
		r4m3nú.
		r4m3nou.
		r4m3ní.
		r4m3ných.
		r4m3nými.
		r4p4č3n
		r4t3ný.
		r4t3ného.
		r4t3nému.
		r4t3nom.
		r4t3ným.
		r4t3né.
		r4t3ná.
		r4t3nej.
		r4t3nú.
		r4t3nou.
		r4t3ní.
		r4t3ných.
		r4t3nými.
		s4t3ný.
		s4t3ného.
		s4t3nému.
		s4t3nom.
		s4t3ným.
		s4t3né.
		s4t3ná.
		s4t3nej.
		s4t3nú.
		s4t3nou.
		s4t3ní.
		s4t3ných.
		s4t3nými.
		z4d3ny.
		z4d3neho.
		z4d3nemu.
		z4d3nom.
		z4d3nym.
		z4d3ne.
		z4d3na.
		z4d3nej.
		z4d3nu.
		z4d3nou.
		z4d3ni.
		z4d3nych.
		z4d3nymi.
		z4d3ný.
		z4d3ného.
		z4d3nému.
		z4d3ným.
		z4d3né.
		z4d3ná.
		z4d3nú.
		z4d3ní.
		z4d3ných.
		z4d3nými.
		<!-- % koncovky -ka -->
		b2l4š3k
		l2t3k2a.
		l2t3k2y.
		l2t3k2e.
		l2t3k2u.
